District of Columbia statutes.
47-4452

Bond to stay collection.

(a)

The collection of any or all of the amount of the assessment may be stayed by filing with the Mayor a bond in an amount, equal to 150% of the amount to be stayed, and with sureties as the Mayor may approve, conditioned upon the payment of the amount (together with interest accruing thereon) for which the collection is stayed. The taxpayer shall have the right to waive the stay at any time in respect to the whole or any part of the amount covered by the bond, and if, as a result of the waiver, part of the assessment covered by the bond is paid, the bond shall, at the request of the taxpayer, be proportionately reduced. If a part of the assessment is abated, the bond shall, at the request of the taxpayer, be proportionately reduced.

(b)

Repealed.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-217, § 4(p), 51 DCR 9126
This section is referenced in § 47-875.
D.C. Law 15-217 repealed subsec. (b) which had read as follows: “(b) If a jeopardy assessment has been made under § 47-4451, the taxpayer may administratively appeal, within 5 business days, the assessment of tax or the seizure of property and the property seized for the collection of the tax shall not be sold until any appeal is completed.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(p) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-513, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8976).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(p) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-553, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10359).